Utah statutes.
59-12-2215.   City or town option sales and use tax for highways or to fund
a system for public transit -- Base -- Rate.
(1)  Subject to the other provisions of this part, a city or town may impose a
sales and use tax of up to .30% on the transactions described in Subsection
59-12-103(1) located within the city or town.
(2)  A city or town imposing a sales and use tax under this section shall
expend the revenues collected from the sales and use tax:
(a)  for the construction and maintenance of highways under the jurisdiction
of the city or town imposing the tax;
(b)  to fund a system for public transit; or
(c)  for a combination of Subsections (2)(a) and (b).
